Indiana, session 2026, SB10.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 5-10-1.1-1.5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.9-2024,
SECTION 122, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 1.5. (a) The state, through the
budget agency, may shall adopt a defined contribution plan, under
Section 401(a) of the Internal Revenue Code, for the purpose of
matching all or a specified portion of state employees' contributions to
the state employees' deferred compensation plan and for any additional
purposes established by statute.
(b) The deferred compensation committee shall be the trustee of a
plan established under subsection (a) as described in section 4 of this
chapter. A plan established under subsection (a) shall be administered
by the state comptroller as described in section 5 of this chapter.
(c) The deferred compensation committee may approve funding
offerings for a plan established under subsection (a), which may be the
same as offerings for the state employees' deferred compensation plan.
All funds in each plan shall be separately accounted for but may be
commingled for investment purposes.
ES 10—LS 6184/DI 144


(d) This subsection applies before January 1, 2027. Contributions
to a plan established under subsection (a) are limited to the amount of
biennial appropriations the budget agency determines are available for
any such purposes.
(e) This subsection applies after December 31, 2026. Subject to
subsections (f) and (g), after December 31, 2026, the state shall
make contributions to the defined contribution plan established for
each state employee under subsection (a) that match, dollar for
dollar, each employee's contributions to the employee's deferred
compensation plan.
(f) The following apply to state contributions under subsection
(e):
(1) State contributions may not exceed twenty-eight dollars
($28) for each payroll warrant or payroll authorization.
(2) State contributions are limited to the amount of biennial
appropriations the budget agency determines are available
for any such purposes.
(g) The budget agency may do the following in consultation with
the state comptroller:
(1) Suspend, in extraordinary financial circumstances, the
payment of state contributions under subsection (e).
(2) If sufficient funds are available, resume the payment of
state contributions following the suspension of payments
under subdivision (1).
(3) If sufficient funds are available, make contributions to the
defined contribution plan established for each state employee
under subsection (a) in an amount equal to the contributions
that each state employee did not receive as a result of the
suspension of payments under subdivision (1).
(h) The deferred compensation committee may use funds available
under the plan to hire or contract with qualified attorneys, financial
advisers, or other professional or administrative persons that the
committee believes are necessary or useful in the administration of the
plan.
(e) (i) A plan established under subsection (a) must include
appropriate provisions concerning the plan's day to day operation and
any other provisions that are appropriate. Notwithstanding IC 22-2-6-2,
the plan may also include provisions for the use of automated voice
response units and telephonic communications, online activities, and
other technology for participant elections, directions, and services if the
technology has sufficient capacity to record and store the elections and
directions.
ES 10—LS 6184/DI 144


(f) The state is obligated at any particular time only for the current
market value of the funding previously made to a plan established
under subsection (a).
(g) (j) The state board of finance shall extend the plan established
under subsection (a) to any political subdivision that also elects to use
the state employees' deferred compensation plan for its employees as
authorized in section 7(b)(2) or 7(b)(3) of this chapter.
SECTION 2. IC 5-10-1.1-7.6 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 7.6. For participants who are
subject to IC 5-10-8.5-9.7(b), the state comptroller shall transfer
from the state general fund a one (1) time contribution of funds to
each participant's defined contribution plan account under
IC 5-10-1.1-1.5(a) based on the contributions the member would
have received according to IC 5-10-8.5-15 based on each member's
age and years of service. The deferred compensation committee
shall adopt any plan provisions necessary to implement this
contribution.
SECTION 3. IC 5-10-8-8.5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.201-2023,
SECTION 78, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 8.5. (a) The retiree health benefit trust fund
is following are established to provide funding for a retiree health
benefit plan developed under IC 5-10-8.5, including to provide
continued funding for a retiree health benefit plan for individuals
described in IC 5-10-8.5-9.7(a) and the individuals who elect to
continue in the retiree health benefit trust fund pursuant to
IC 5-10-8.5-9.7(c):
(1) Before January 1, 2027, the retiree health benefit trust
fund.
(2) After December 31, 2026, the 2027 retiree health benefit
trust fund.
The trust fund described in subdivision (1) will be terminated upon
the completion of the action required under IC 5-10-8.5-9.7.
(b) The trust fund funds shall be administered by the INPRS. The
expenses of administering the trust fund funds shall be paid from
money in the trust fund. funds. Subject to section 8.6 of this chapter,
the trust fund consists funds consist of cigarette tax revenues deposited
in the fund funds under IC 6-7-1-28.1(6) and other appropriations,
revenues, or transfers to the trust fund funds under IC 4-12-1.
(c) The INPRS shall invest the money in the trust fund funds not
currently needed to meet the obligations of the trust fund funds in the
same manner and with the same limitations described in IC 5-10.5-4-1
ES 10—LS 6184/DI 144


and IC 5-10.5-5-1.
(d) The trust fund is funds are considered a trust fund for purposes
of IC 4-9.1-1-7. Money may not be transferred, assigned, or otherwise
removed from the trust fund funds by the state board of finance, the
budget agency, or any other state agency, except as provided under
IC 5-10-8.5-9.7 and IC 6-7-1-28.1(6)(B).
(e) The trust fund funds shall be established and administered in a
manner that complies with Internal Revenue Code requirements
concerning health reimbursement arrangement (HRA) trusts.
Contributions by the state to the trust fund funds are irrevocable. All
assets held in the trust fund funds must be held for the exclusive
benefit of participants of the retiree health benefit plan developed
under IC 5-10-8.5 and their beneficiaries. Subject to IC 5-10-8.5-9.7,
all assets in the trust fund: funds:
(1) are dedicated exclusively to providing benefits to participants
of the plan and their beneficiaries according to the terms of the
plan; and
(2) are exempt from levy, sale, garnishment, attachment, or other
legal process.
(f) Money in the trust fund funds does not revert to the state general
fund at the end of any state fiscal year.
(g) The money in the trust fund funds is appropriated to the INPRS
for providing the retiree health benefit plan developed under
IC 5-10-8.5.
(h) The budget agency may transfer appropriations from federal or
dedicated funds to the retiree health benefit trust fund. trust funds.
SECTION 4. IC 5-10-8-8.6 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 8.6. (a) This section does not apply to
cigarette tax revenues deposited in the retiree health benefit trust
fund or the 2027 retiree health benefit trust fund under
IC 6-7-1-28.1(6)(B) after December 31, 2026.
(b) The INPRS shall do the following not later than December
31, 2026:
(1) Determine the amount of forthcoming appropriations,
revenues, or transfers to the retiree health benefit trust fund
under IC 4-12-1 that are not currently needed to meet the
obligations of the retiree health benefit plan developed under
IC 5-10-8.5.
(2) Provide written notice of the amount determined under
subdivision (1) to the budget agency.
(c) This subsection applies after December 31, 2026. Before
ES 10—LS 6184/DI 144


appropriations, revenues, or transfers under IC 4-12-1 are
deposited in the retiree health benefit trust fund, the budget agency
shall transfer the amounts determined by the INPRS under
subsection (b)(1) to the state general fund. The budget agency shall
deposit the remainder of the appropriations, revenues, or transfers
in the retiree health benefit trust fund or the 2027 retiree health
benefit trust fund.
SECTION 5. IC 5-10-8.5-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.229-2011,
SECTION 70, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 1. (a) Except as provided in this section, this
chapter applies to an individual who is one (1) of subsection (b), each
of the following is a participant in the retirement medical benefits
account:
(1) An employee of the executive, legislative, or judicial branch
of state government.
(2) A state elected or appointed officer.
(3) A member of the general assembly.
(4) An elected officer paid by the state.
(5) An officer paid by the state under IC 33-23-5-10,
IC 33-38-5-7, or IC 33-39-6-2.
(b) An individual described in subsection (a) other than The
following is a participant individuals are not participants in the
retirement medical benefits account:
(1) A conservation officer of the department of natural resources.
(2) An employee of the state excise police.
(3) An employee of the state police department, other than the
following:
(A) An employee of the state police department who waived
coverage under a common and unified plan of self-insurance
under IC 5-10-8-6 before July 1, 2011.
(B) An employee of the state police department who makes an
election under IC 5-10-8.5-9.5.
(C) An employee of the state police department who makes an
election under IC 5-10-8.5-9.6.
(4) An individual who becomes employed in a position
described in subsection (a) after December 31, 2026.
(5) An individual whose membership in the account is
terminated under section 9.7(b) of this chapter.
SECTION 6. IC 5-10-8.5-9.7 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 9.7. (a) This section does not
apply to a:
ES 10—LS 6184/DI 144


(1) retired participant or the spouse and dependents of a
retired participant; or
(2) participant who is eligible to receive an additional
contribution under section 16 of this chapter.
(b) Subject to applicable federal tax law, except as provided in
subsection (c), the following apply after December 31, 2026:
(1) Each participant's membership in the retirement medical
benefits account is terminated.
(2) The amounts in each participant's subaccount are
forfeited.
(3) The INPRS shall do the following for each participant:
(A) Terminate the participant's membership in the
retirement medical benefits account.
(B) Transfer the amounts in the participant's subaccount
to the state general fund to be used in the manner required
under subdivision (4).
(4) The state comptroller shall transfer from the state general
fund to each participant's defined contribution plan under
IC 5-10-1.1-1.5(a) an amount equal to the balance in each
participant's subaccount at the time the subaccount was
forfeited under subdivision (2) in accordance with the
amounts a member would have received under section 15 of
this chapter based on each member's age and years of service.
(c) Subsection (b) does not apply to a participant who makes a
one (1) time irrevocable election to become a participant in a
successor retirement medical benefits account. An election under
this subsection must be made to the INPRS:
(1) during the open enrollment period for state employees;
and
(2) not later than December 1, 2026.
SECTION 7. IC 5-10-8.5-15, AS AMENDED BY P.L.92-2021,
SECTION 6, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 15. (a) Except as provided in subsections (c),
(d), and (e), a participant's employer shall make contributions annually
to the account on behalf of the participant sufficient to provide the
benefit described in section 17 of this chapter. For a participant
meeting the eligibility rules set forth in section 17 of this chapter, the
amount credited to the participant's subaccount balance shall be the
sum of annual contributions and earnings for each year of service. The
amount of the contribution each fiscal year must equal or exceed the
following, based on the participant's age on the last day of the calendar
year that is in the fiscal year in which the contribution is made:
ES 10—LS 6184/DI 144


Participant's Age in Years Annual Contribution
Amount
Less than 30 $ 500
At least 30, but less than 40 $ 800
At least 40, but less than 50 $ 1,100
At least 50 $ 1,400
(b) The INPRS shall determine by rule the date on which the
contributions are credited to participants' subaccounts.
(c) A contribution under this section shall not be made after June
30, 2011, to any of the following participants:
(1) A conservation officer of the department of natural resources.
(2) An employee of the state excise police.
(3) An employee of the state police department, other than the
following:
(A) An employee of the state police department who waived
coverage under a common and unified plan of self-insurance
under IC 5-10-8-6 before July 1, 2011.
(B) An employee of the state police department who makes an
election under IC 5-10-8.5-9.5.
(C) An employee of the state police department who makes an
election under IC 5-10-8.5-9.6.
(d) For individuals who are employed on June 30, 2011, the accrued
annual contributions made in accordance with subsection (a) to an
account described in section 14 of this chapter on behalf of the
individuals for any years the individuals were employed as described
in section 1(b)(1) through 1(b)(3) of this chapter shall be transferred to
the respective plans described in IC 5-10-8-6(a) for those individuals
and shall be used only to reduce the unfunded other post-employment
benefit (OPEB) liability of those plans and not to increase benefits or
reduce premiums.
(e) A contribution under this section shall not be made after June
30, 2017, to a participant who on June 30, 2017:
(1) is eligible for a normal, unreduced retirement benefit from the
public employee retirement fund of which the participant is a
member; and
(2) has completed:
(A) fifteen (15) years of service with the participant's employer;
or
(B) ten (10) years of service as an elected or appointed officer.
(f) Each year, the INPRS shall:
(1) report the assets and liabilities of the retiree health benefit
trust fund or the 2027 retiree health benefit trust fund; and
ES 10—LS 6184/DI 144


(2) based on the assets and liabilities of the retiree health benefit
trust fund or the 2027 retiree health benefit trust fund,
recommend an employer contribution amount to fund the
participants' benefits described in section 17 of this chapter.
SECTION 8. IC 6-7-1-28.1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.213-2025,
SECTION 86, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 28.1. The taxes, registration fees, fines, or
penalties collected under this chapter shall be deposited in the
following manner:
(1) One and seventy-six hundredths percent (1.76%) of the money
shall be deposited in a fund to be known as the cigarette tax fund.
(2) The following amount of the money shall be deposited in the
state general fund:
(A) After June 30, 2011, and before July 1, 2013, sixty and
twenty-four hundredths percent (60.24%).
(B) After June 30, 2013, and before July 1, 2023, fifty-six and
twenty-four hundredths percent (56.24%).
(C) After June 30, 2023, fifty-six and eighty-four hundredths
percent (56.84%).
(D) After June 30, 2025, twenty-three and sixty-seven
hundredths percent (23.67%).
(3) Two and twenty-six hundredths percent (2.26%) of the money
shall be deposited into the pension relief fund established in
IC 5-10.3-11.
(4) Eleven and twenty-six hundredths percent (11.26%) of the
money shall be deposited in the healthy Indiana plan trust fund
established by IC 12-15-44.2-17.
(5) Fifty-nine and thirty-eight hundredths percent (59.38%) of the
money shall be deposited in the state general fund for the purpose
of paying appropriations for Medicaid—Current Obligations.
(6) The following amount of the money shall be deposited in the
state retiree health benefit trust fund established by IC 5-10-8-8.5
as follows:
(A) Before July 1, 2011, five and seventy-four hundredths
percent (5.74%).
(B) After June 30, 2011, and before July 1, 2013, zero percent
(0%).
(C) After June 30, 2013, four percent (4%).
(D) After June 30, 2025, one and sixty-seven hundredths
percent (1.67%).
(A) After June 30, 2025, and before July 1, 2026, one and
sixty-seven hundredths percent (1.67%) shall be deposited
ES 10—LS 6184/DI 144


in the state retiree health benefit trust fund established by
IC 5-10-8-8.5.
(B) After June 30, 2026, and before July 1, 2027, one and
sixty-seven hundredths percent (1.67%) or the amount
determined by the budget agency shall be deposited in the
state retiree health benefit trust fund or the 2027 retiree
health benefit trust fund established by IC 5-10-8-8.5. If the
budget agency determines that less than one and sixty-seven
hundredths percent (1.67%) should be deposited in the trust
funds, the remainder shall be transferred to the state
general fund.
(C) After June 30, 2027, one and sixty-seven hundredths
percent (1.67%) of the money shall be deposited in the state
general fund.
The money in the cigarette tax fund, the healthy Indiana plan trust fund,
or the pension relief fund at the end of a fiscal year does not revert to
the state general fund. However, if in any fiscal year, the amount
allocated to a fund under subdivision (1) is less than the amount
received in fiscal year 1977, then that fund shall be credited with the
difference between the amount allocated and the amount received in
fiscal year 1977, and the allocation for the fiscal year to the fund under
subdivision (2) shall be reduced by the amount of that difference.
Money deposited under subdivisions (5) through (6) may not be used
for any purpose other than the purpose stated in the subdivision.
SECTION 9. An emergency is declared for this act.
ES 10—LS 6184/DI 144


COMMITTEE REPORT
Mr. President: The Senate Committee on Pensions and Labor, to
which was referred Senate Bill No. 10, has had the same under
consideration and begs leave to report the same back to the Senate with
the recommendation that said bill be AMENDED as follows:
Page 3, line 5, delete "(j)".
Page 3, line 5, strike "The state is obligated at any particular time
only for the".
Page 3, strike lines 6 through 7.
Page 3, line 8, delete "(k)" and insert "(j)".
Page 3, line 31, after "Sec. 7.6." insert "For participants who are
subject to IC 5-10-8.5-9.7(b), the state comptroller shall transfer
from the state general fund a one (1) time contribution of funds to
each participant's defined contribution plan account under
IC 5-10-1.1-1.5(a) based on the contributions the member would
have received according to IC 5-10-8.5-15 based on each member's
age and years of service.".
Page 3, line 33, delete "the transfer of amounts under
IC 5-10-8.5-9.7(b)(4)." and insert "this contribution.".
Page 3, delete lines 34 through 42.
Page 4, delete lines 1 through 27, begin a new paragraph and insert:
"SECTION 4. IC 5-10-8-8.5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.201-2023,
SECTION 78, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 8.5. (a) The retiree health benefit trust fund
is following are established to provide funding for a retiree health
benefit plan developed under IC 5-10-8.5, including to provide
continued funding for a retiree health benefit plan for individuals
described in IC 5-10-8.5-9.7(a) and the individuals who elect to
continue in the retiree health benefit trust fund pursuant to
IC 5-10-8.5-9.7(c):
(1) Before January 1, 2027, the retiree health benefit trust
fund.
(2) After December 31, 2026, the 2027 retiree health benefit
trust fund.
The trust fund described in subdivision (1) will be terminated upon
the completion of the action required under IC 5-10-8.5-9.7.
(b) The trust fund funds shall be administered by the INPRS. The
expenses of administering the trust fund funds shall be paid from
money in the trust fund. funds. Subject to section 8.6 of this chapter,
the trust fund consists funds consist of cigarette tax revenues deposited
in the fund funds under IC 6-7-1-28.1(6) IC 6-7-1-28.1(6)(A) and
ES 10—LS 6184/DI 144


other appropriations, revenues, or transfers to the trust fund funds
under IC 4-12-1.
(c) The INPRS shall invest the money in the trust fund funds not
currently needed to meet the obligations of the trust fund funds in the
same manner and with the same limitations described in IC 5-10.5-4-1
and IC 5-10.5-5-1.
(d) The trust fund is funds are considered a trust fund for purposes
of IC 4-9.1-1-7. Money may not be transferred, assigned, or otherwise
removed from the trust fund funds by the state board of finance, the
budget agency, or any other state agency, except as provided under
IC 5-10-8.5-9.7.
(e) The trust fund funds shall be established and administered in a
manner that complies with Internal Revenue Code requirements
concerning health reimbursement arrangement (HRA) trusts.
Contributions by the state to the trust fund funds are irrevocable. All
assets held in the trust fund funds must be held for the exclusive
benefit of participants of the retiree health benefit plan developed
under IC 5-10-8.5 and their beneficiaries. Subject to IC 5-10-8.5-9.7,
all assets in the trust fund: funds:
(1) are dedicated exclusively to providing benefits to participants
of the plan and their beneficiaries according to the terms of the
plan; and
(2) are exempt from levy, sale, garnishment, attachment, or other
legal process.
(f) Money in the trust fund funds does not revert to the state general
fund at the end of any state fiscal year.
(g) The money in the trust fund funds is appropriated to the INPRS
for providing the retiree health benefit plan developed under
IC 5-10-8.5.
(h) The budget agency may transfer appropriations from federal or
dedicated funds to the retiree health benefit trust fund. trust funds.".
Page 4, line 32, after "fund" insert "or the 2027 retiree health
benefit trust fund".
Page 5, line 8, delete "fund." and insert "fund or the 2027 retiree
health benefit trust fund.".
Page 6, line 4, delete "who received" and insert "who is eligible to
receive".
Page 6, line 22, delete "subdivision (2)." and insert "subdivision (2)
in accordance with the amounts a member would have received
under section 15 of this chapter based on each member's age and
years of service.".
Page 6, delete lines 23 through 26, begin a new paragraph and
ES 10—LS 6184/DI 144


insert:
"(c) Subsection (b) does not apply to a participant who makes a
one (1) time irrevocable election to become a participant in a
successor retirement medical benefits account. An election under
this subsection must be made to the INPRS:".
Page 6, between lines 29 and 30, begin a new paragraph and insert:
"SECTION 8. IC 5-10-8.5-15, AS AMENDED BY P.L.92-2021,
SECTION 6, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 15. (a) Except as provided in subsections (c),
(d), and (e), a participant's employer shall make contributions annually
to the account on behalf of the participant sufficient to provide the
benefit described in section 17 of this chapter. For a participant
meeting the eligibility rules set forth in section 17 of this chapter, the
amount credited to the participant's subaccount balance shall be the
sum of annual contributions and earnings for each year of service. The
amount of the contribution each fiscal year must equal or exceed the
following, based on the participant's age on the last day of the calendar
year that is in the fiscal year in which the contribution is made:
Participant's Age in Years Annual Contribution
Amount
Less than 30 $ 500
At least 30, but less than 40 $ 800
At least 40, but less than 50 $ 1,100
At least 50 $ 1,400
(b) The INPRS shall determine by rule the date on which the
contributions are credited to participants' subaccounts.
(c) A contribution under this section shall not be made after June
30, 2011, to any of the following participants:
(1) A conservation officer of the department of natural resources.
(2) An employee of the state excise police.
(3) An employee of the state police department, other than the
following:
(A) An employee of the state police department who waived
coverage under a common and unified plan of self-insurance
under IC 5-10-8-6 before July 1, 2011.
(B) An employee of the state police department who makes an
election under IC 5-10-8.5-9.5.
(C) An employee of the state police department who makes an
election under IC 5-10-8.5-9.6.
(d) For individuals who are employed on June 30, 2011, the accrued
annual contributions made in accordance with subsection (a) to an
account described in section 14 of this chapter on behalf of the
ES 10—LS 6184/DI 144


individuals for any years the individuals were employed as described
in section 1(b)(1) through 1(b)(3) of this chapter shall be transferred to
the respective plans described in IC 5-10-8-6(a) for those individuals
and shall be used only to reduce the unfunded other post-employment
benefit (OPEB) liability of those plans and not to increase benefits or
reduce premiums.
(e) A contribution under this section shall not be made after June
30, 2017, to a participant who on June 30, 2017:
(1) is eligible for a normal, unreduced retirement benefit from the
public employee retirement fund of which the participant is a
member; and
(2) has completed:
(A) fifteen (15) years of service with the participant's employer;
or
(B) ten (10) years of service as an elected or appointed officer.
(f) Each year, the INPRS shall:
(1) report the assets and liabilities of the retiree health benefit
trust fund or the 2027 retiree health benefit trust fund; and
(2) based on the assets and liabilities of the retiree health benefit
trust fund or the 2027 retiree health benefit trust fund,
recommend an employer contribution amount to fund the
participants' benefits described in section 17 of this chapter.".
Page 7, line 25, after "fund" insert "or the 2027 retiree health
benefit trust fund".
Renumber all SECTIONS consecutively.
and when so amended that said bill do pass and be reassigned to the
Senate Committee on Appropriations.
(Reference is to SB 10 as introduced.)
ROGERS, Chairperson
Committee Vote: Yeas 10, Nays 0.
_____
COMMITTEE REPORT
Mr. President: The Senate Committee on Appropriations, to which
was referred Senate Bill No. 10, has had the same under consideration
and begs leave to report the same back to the Senate with the
recommendation that said bill be AMENDED as follows:
ES 10—LS 6184/DI 144


Replace the effective dates in SECTIONS 1 through 9 with
"[EFFECTIVE JANUARY 1, 2028]".
Page 2, line 1, delete "2027." and insert "2028.".
Page 2, line 5, delete "2026." and insert "2027.".
Page 2, line 6, delete "2026," and insert "2027,".
Page 2, line 13, delete "Except as provided in section 1.7 of this
chapter, state" and insert "State".
Page 2, delete lines 16 through 21, begin a new line block indented
and insert:
"(2) State contributions are limited to the amount of biennial
appropriations the budget agency determines are available
for any such purposes.".
Page 3, delete lines 12 through 28.
Page 4, line 7, delete "2027," and insert "2028,".
Page 4, line 9, delete "2026," and insert "2027,".
Page 4, line 9, after "the" delete "2027" and insert "2028".
Page 5, line 11, delete "2027" and insert "2028".
Page 5, line 14, delete "2026:" and insert "2027:".
Page 5, line 22, delete "2026." and insert "2027.".
Page 5, line 26, delete "state comptroller for the purpose of making"
and insert "state general fund.".
Page 5, delete line 27.
Page 5, line 28, delete "under IC 5-10-1.1-1.5(a).".
Page 5, line 30, delete "2027" and insert "2028".
Page 6, line 18, delete "2026." and insert "2027.".
Page 6, line 30, delete "2026:" and insert "2027:".
Page 7, line 12, delete "2026." and insert "2027.".
Page 8, line 24, delete "2027" and insert "2028".
Page 8, line 26, delete "2027" and insert "2028".
Page 9, line 13, delete "2026," and insert "2027,".
Page 9, line 24, delete "2027" and insert "2028".
Page 9, line 31, delete "state comptroller for the purpose" and insert
"state general fund.".
Page 9, delete lines 32 through 33.
Page 10, delete line 2.
Renumber all SECTIONS consecutively.
and when so amended that said bill do pass.
(Reference is to SB 10 as printed December 11, 2025.)
ES 10—LS 6184/DI 144


GARTEN, Chairperson
Committee Vote: Yeas 13, Nays 0.
_____
SENATE MOTION
Mr. President: I move that Senate Bill 10 be amended to read as
follows:
Replace the effective dates in SECTIONS 1 through 8 with
"[EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE]".
Page 2, line 1, delete "2028." and insert "2027.".
Page 2, line 5, delete "2027." and insert "2026.".
Page 2, line 6, delete "2027," and insert "2026,".
Page 3, line 28, delete "2028," and insert "2027,".
Page 3, line 30, delete "2027," and insert "2026,".
Page 3, line 30, delete "2028" and insert "2027".
Page 3, line 38, reset in roman "IC 6-7-1-28.1(6)".
Page 3, line 38, delete "IC 6-7-1-28.1(6)(A)".
Page 4, line 7, delete "IC 5-10-8.5-9.7." and insert "IC 5-10-8.5-9.7
and IC 6-7-1-28.1(6)(B).".
Page 4, line 32, delete "2028" and insert "2027".
Page 4, line 33, delete "IC 6-7-1-28.1(6)(A)." and insert "IC
6-7-1-28.1(6)(B) after December 31, 2026.".
Page 4, line 35, delete "2027:" and insert "2026:".
Page 5, line 1, delete "2027." and insert "2026.".
Page 5, line 7, delete "2028" and insert "2027".
Page 5, line 37, delete "2027." and insert "2026.".
Page 6, line 7, delete "2027:" and insert "2026:".
Page 6, line 31, delete "2027." and insert "2026.".
Page 8, line 1, delete "2028" and insert "2027".
Page 8, line 3, delete "2028" and insert "2027".
Page 8, line 32, reset in roman "The following amount".
Page 8, line 32, delete "After December 31, 2027, one and".
Page 8, line 33, delete "sixty-seven hundredths percent (1.67%)".
Page 9, delete lines 1 through 8, begin a new line double block
indented and insert:
"(A) After June 30, 2025, and before July 1, 2026, one and
sixty-seven hundredths percent (1.67%) shall be deposited
in the state retiree health benefit trust fund established by
IC 5-10-8-8.5.
(B) After June 30, 2026, and before July 1, 2027, one and
ES 10—LS 6184/DI 144


sixty-seven hundredths percent (1.67%) or the amount
determined by the budget agency shall be deposited in the
state retiree health benefit trust fund or the 2027 retiree
health benefit trust fund established by IC 5-10-8-8.5. If the
budget agency determines that less than one and sixty-seven
hundredths percent (1.67%) should be deposited in the trust
funds, the remainder shall be transferred to the state
general fund.
(C) After June 30, 2027, one and sixty-seven hundredths
percent (1.67%) of the money shall be deposited in the state
general fund.".
Page 9, after line 18, begin a new paragraph and insert:
"SECTION 9. An emergency is declared for this act.".
(Reference is to SB 10 as printed January 23, 2026.)
ROGERS
_____
COMMITTEE REPORT
Mr. Speaker: Your Committee on Employment, Labor and Pensions,
to which was referred Senate Bill 10, has had the same under
consideration and begs leave to report the same back to the House with
the recommendation that said bill do pass.
(Reference is to SB 10 as reprinted January 28, 2026.)
VANNATTER
Committee Vote: Yeas 12, Nays 0
ES 10—LS 6184/DI 144